Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,161
Person, defined.

The word person wherever used in the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act shall be construed to mean any person, partnership, limited liability company, joint-stock company, unincorporated association, society, or municipal or other corporation of any character whatsoever.

Laws 1929, c. 75, § 13, p. 259;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,152;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,161;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 173.

The term "person" as used in this section is broad enough to include the state or any subdivision thereof. Hoiengs v. County of Adams, 245 Neb. 877, 516 N.W.2d 223 (1994).

An unincorporated association is included within the statutory definition of a person. Nebraska Seedsmen Assn. v. Department of Agriculture & Inspection, 162 Neb. 781, 77 N.W.2d 464 (1956).